California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
-------------------------------------------

14005.30.

(a) Medi-Cal benefits under this chapter shall be provided to individuals eligible for services under Section 1396u-1 of Title 42 of the United States Code with family incomes that do not exceed 109 percent of the federal poverty level.

(b) (1) Except as provided for in paragraph (3), when determining eligibility under this section, an applicant’s or beneficiary’s income and resources shall be determined, counted, and valued in accordance with the requirements of Section 1396a(e)(14) of Title 42 of the United States Code, as added by the ACA.

(2) When determining eligibility under this section, an applicant’s or beneficiary’s assets shall not be considered and deprivation shall
 not be a requirement for eligibility.

(3) The department shall seek federal approval to use the determination of eligibility for the CalWORKs program as a determination of eligibility for Medi-Cal benefits under this section. The department’s use of the CalWORKs eligibility determination to determine eligibility for Medi-Cal benefits under this section shall be consistent, and in conformity, with the terms of the federal approval.

(c) For purposes of calculating income under this section during any calendar year, increases in social security benefit payments under Title II of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 401 et seq.) arising from cost-of-living adjustments shall be disregarded commencing in the month that these social security benefit payments are increased by the cost-of-living adjustment through the month before the month in which a change in the federal
 poverty level requires the department to modify the income disregard and in which new income limits for the program established by this section are adopted by the department.

(d) The MAGI-based income eligibility standard applied under this section shall conform with the maintenance of effort requirements of Sections 1396a(e)(14) and 1396a(gg) of Title 42 of the United States Code, as added by the ACA.

(e) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “ACA” means the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Public Law 111-148), as originally enacted and as amended by the federal Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010 (Public Law 111-152) and any subsequent amendments.

(2) “MAGI-based income” means
 income calculated using the financial methodologies described in Section 1396a(e)(14) of Title 42 of the United States Code, as added by the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Public Law 111-148) and as amended by the federal Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010 (Public Law 111-152) and any subsequent amendments.

(f) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of all-county letters, plan letters, plan or provider bulletins, or similar instructions until the time any necessary regulations are adopted. The department shall adopt regulations by July 1, 2018, in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. Commencing six months after the effective date of this section,
 and notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, the department shall provide a status report to the Legislature on a semiannual basis, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, until regulations have been adopted.

(g) This section shall be implemented only if and to the extent that federal financial participation is available and any necessary federal approvals have been obtained.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 52, Sec. 21.   (SB 97)   Effective July 10, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

14005.31.

(a) (1) Subject to paragraph (2), for any person whose eligibility for benefits under Section 14005.30 has been determined with a concurrent determination of eligibility for cash aid under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200), loss of eligibility or termination of cash aid under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200) shall not result in a loss of eligibility or termination of
 benefits under Section 14005.30 absent the existence of a factor that would result in loss of eligibility for benefits under Section 14005.30 for a person whose eligibility under Section 14005.30 was determined without a concurrent determination of eligibility for benefits under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200).

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), a person whose eligibility would otherwise be terminated pursuant to that paragraph shall not have his or her eligibility terminated until the transfer procedures set forth in Section 14005.32 or the redetermination procedures set forth in Section 14005.37 and all due process requirements have been met.

(b) The department, in consultation with the counties and representatives of consumers, managed care plans, and Medi-Cal providers, shall prepare a simple, clear, consumer-friendly notice to be used by the counties to inform
 Medi-Cal beneficiaries whose eligibility for cash aid under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200) has ended, but whose eligibility for benefits under Section 14005.30 continues pursuant to subdivision (a), that their benefits will continue. To the extent feasible, the notice shall be sent out at the same time as the notice of discontinuation of cash aid, and shall include all of the following:

(1) A statement that Medi-Cal benefits will continue even though cash aid under the CalWORKs program has been terminated.

(2) A statement that continued receipt of Medi-Cal benefits will not be counted against any time limits in existence for receipt of cash aid under the CalWORKs program.

(3) A statement that the Medi-Cal beneficiary does not need to fill out monthly status reports in order to remain eligible for Medi-Cal,
 but may be required to submit annual reaffirmation forms. The notice shall remind individuals whose cash aid ended under the CalWORKs program as a result of not submitting a status report that he or she should review his or her circumstances to determine if changes have occurred that should be reported to the Medi-Cal eligibility worker.

(4) A statement describing the responsibility of the Medi-Cal beneficiary to report to the county, within 10 days, significant changes that may affect eligibility.

(5) A telephone number to call for more information.

(6) A statement that the Medi-Cal beneficiary’s eligibility worker will not change, or, if the case has been reassigned, the new worker’s name, address, and telephone number, and the hours during which the county’s eligibility workers can be contacted.

(c) This section shall be implemented only to the extent that federal financial participation under Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396 et seq.) is available.

(d) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department, without taking any further regulatory action, shall implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of all-county letters, plan letters, plan or provider bulletins, or similar instructions until the time regulations are adopted. Thereafter, the department shall adopt regulations in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. Beginning six months after the effective date of this section, and notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, the
 department shall provide a status report to the Legislature on a semiannual basis until regulations have been adopted.

(e) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2014.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 6) and added by Stats. 2013, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 4, Sec. 7.   (SB 1 1x)   Effective September 30, 2013.   Section operative January 1, 2014, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

14005.32.

(a) (1) If the county has evidence clearly demonstrating that a beneficiary is not eligible for benefits under this chapter pursuant to Section 14005.30, but is eligible for benefits under this chapter pursuant to other provisions of law, the county shall transfer the individual to the corresponding Medi-Cal program in conformity with and subject to the requirements of Section 14005.37. Eligibility under Section 14005.30 shall continue until the transfer is complete.

(2) The department, in consultation with the counties and representatives of consumers, managed care plans, and Medi-Cal providers, shall prepare a simple, clear, consumer-friendly notice to be used by the counties to inform beneficiaries that their Medi-Cal benefits have
 been transferred pursuant to paragraph (1) and to inform them about the program to which they have been transferred. To the extent feasible, the notice shall be issued with the notice of discontinuance from cash aid, and shall include all of the following:

(A) A statement that Medi-Cal benefits will continue under another program, even though aid under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200) has been terminated.

(B) The name of the program under which benefits will continue and an explanation of that program.

(C) A statement that continued receipt of Medi-Cal benefits will not be counted against any time limits in existence for receipt of cash aid under the CalWORKs program.

(D) A statement that the Medi-Cal beneficiary does not need to fill out
 monthly status reports in order to remain eligible for Medi-Cal, but may be required to submit annual reaffirmation forms. In addition, if the person or persons to whom the notice is directed has been found eligible for transitional Medi-Cal as described in Section 14005.8 or 14005.85, the statement shall explain the reporting requirements and duration of benefits under those programs and shall further explain that, at the end of the duration of these benefits, a redetermination, as provided in Section 14005.37, shall be conducted to determine whether benefits are available under any other law.

(E) A statement describing the beneficiary’s responsibility to report to the county, within 10 days, significant changes that may affect eligibility or spend down of excess
 income.

(F) A telephone number to call for more information.

(G) A statement that the beneficiary’s eligibility worker will not change, or, if the case has been reassigned, the new worker’s name, address, and telephone number, and the hours during which the county’s Medi-Cal eligibility workers can be contacted.

(b) This section shall be implemented only to the extent that federal financial participation under Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396 et seq.) is available.

(c) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department, without taking any further regulatory action, shall implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of all-county letters, plan letters, plan or provider bulletins, or similar instructions until the time regulations are adopted. Thereafter, the department shall adopt regulations in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. Beginning six months after the effective date of this section, and notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, the department shall provide a status report to the Legislature on a semiannual basis until regulations have been adopted.

(d) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2014.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 42, Sec. 79.   (AB 118)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

14005.33.

(a) If a Medi-Cal beneficiary’s Medi-Cal eligibility worker is changed, notice shall be sent to the beneficiary within 10 days of the change. This notice shall include the worker’s name, address, and telephone number, and the beneficiary’s Medi-Cal case number, and hours during which the county’s Medi-Cal eligibility workers may be contacted by the beneficiary.

(b) This section shall be implemented on or before July 1, 2001.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1088, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

14005.34.

(a) For an individual whose cash aid was terminated pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200), but whose Medi-Cal eligibility was continued either pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 14005.31 or pursuant to a transfer of eligibility under Section 14005.32, the Medi-Cal beneficiary’s annual reaffirmation date under Section 14012 shall be no earlier than 12 months from the date on which the most recent annual CalWORKs cash aid eligibility determination was conducted, or, if no such determination was conducted, 12 months from the
 date cash aid was granted.

(b) This section shall be implemented on or before July 1, 2001, but only to the extent that federal financial participation under Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (Title 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396 and following) is available.

(c) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department shall, without taking any regulatory action, implement this section by means of all county letters or similar instructions. Thereafter, the department shall adopt regulations in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. Comprehensive implementing instructions shall be issued to the counties no later than March 1, 2001.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1088, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

14005.35.

The department, in consultation with the counties and representatives of consumers, managed care plans, and Medi-Cal providers, shall study the feasibility of adopting a mechanism whereby, to the extent federal financial participation is available, a Medi-Cal managed care plan shall be notified whenever the eligibility of a Medi-Cal beneficiary enrolled in that plan is being redetermined, including notice of the date upon which any forms must be submitted to the county by the beneficiary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 159, Sec. 195.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

14005.36.

(a) (1) (A) The department shall undertake efforts to conduct outreach about work or community engagement requirements, more frequent redeterminations, and changes to retroactive eligibility to impacted Medi-Cal beneficiaries pursuant to changes made under federal H.R. 1 (Public Law 119-21).

(B) The outreach shall include information on how to comply with the work or community engagement requirements, an explanation of the definition of an “applicable individual” as set forth in subsection (xx) of Section 1396a of Title 42 of the United States Code, and those beneficiaries who may be exempted, including any reporting requirements and processes to meet an exemption, and the consequences of noncompliance.

(C) The department shall provide an outreach notice to the beneficiary by mail, or an electronic format if elected by the individual, and by one or more additional formats. Additional formats may include telephone, text message, an internet website, other commonly available electronic means, and other formats that the United States Secretary of Health and Human Services determines appropriate.

(D) Beneficiary outreach and education shall be coordinated across public social services programs to help minimize barriers to administrative disenrollments.

(E) The department shall solicit input from existing department-convened stakeholder workgroup meetings and member advisory boards, to the extent feasible, to help inform member communications and outreach strategies.

(2) (A) The county shall undertake outreach efforts to beneficiaries receiving benefits under this chapter, in order to maintain the most up-to-date home addresses, telephone numbers, and other necessary contact information, and to encourage and assist with timely submission of the annual reaffirmation form, and, when applicable, transitional Medi-Cal program reporting forms and to facilitate the Medi-Cal redetermination process, including the requirements of Public Law 119-21. In implementing this subdivision, a county shall make a good faith effort to collaborate with community-based organizations, provided that confidentiality is protected. A county shall exercise its discretion in determining which community-based organizations are best situated to assist in outreach efforts, particularly in efforts aimed at difficult-to-reach individuals and communities.

(B) The county outreach efforts shall meet cultural and linguistic appropriateness standards, in alignment with the National Standards for Culturally and Linguistically Appropriate Services.

(b) The department shall encourage and facilitate efforts by managed care plans to report updated beneficiary contact information to counties.

(c) (1) The department and each county shall incorporate, in a timely manner, updated contact information received from managed care plans pursuant to subdivision (b) into the beneficiary’s Medi-Cal case file and into all systems used to inform plans of their beneficiaries’ enrollee status. Updated Medi-Cal beneficiary contact information shall be limited to the beneficiary’s telephone number, change of address information, and change of name.

(2) When a
 managed care plan obtains a beneficiary’s updated contact information, the managed care plan shall provide the beneficiary’s updated contact information to the appropriate county.

(d) The department shall share beneficiary redetermination data, including the date of redetermination, with applicable managed care plans to aid in managed care plans’ efforts to assist beneficiaries with retaining Medi-Cal coverage, including incorporation into the managed care plans’ outreach and education efforts.

(e) This section shall be implemented only to the extent that federal financial participation under Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec.
 1396 et seq.) is available.

(f) To the extent otherwise required by Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department shall adopt emergency regulations implementing this section no later than July 1, 2015. The department may thereafter readopt the emergency regulations pursuant to that chapter. The adoption and readoption, by the department, of regulations implementing this section shall be deemed to be an emergency and necessary to avoid serious harm to the public peace, health, safety, or general welfare for purposes of Sections 11346.1 and 11349.6 of the Government Code, and the department is hereby exempted from the requirement that it describe facts showing the need for immediate action and from review by the Office of Administrative Law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 252, Sec. 17.   (AB 173)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

14005.365.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to develop a data dashboard to collect, track, analyze, and report on metrics related to the impact of federal H.R. 1 (Public Law 119-21) on Medi-Cal eligibility and enrollment.

(b) The department, in collaboration with the California Health and Human Services Agency and in consultation with the California Health Benefit Exchange (Covered California), shall establish a data dashboard that provides data on applications, enrollment, redeterminations, disenrollments, and terminations, stratified by county and by demographic data, including age, race, ethnicity, language, and gender. The dashboard shall exclude any personally identifiable information.

(c) The dashboard shall track and report on the specific data for work or community engagement requirements and exemptions under Public Law 119-21, including all of the following:

(1) Enrollment totals of individuals receiving Medi-Cal coverage.

(2) (A) Outcomes of determinations and redetermination of Medi-Cal eligibility.

(B) Number of ex parte approvals, including procedural or administrative denials or terminations, and appeals data.

(3) Number of individuals subject to work or community engagement requirements and their compliance with the requirements.

(A) Of this group, the top five reasons that applications are denied and enrollees are terminated
 or disenrolled based on work or community engagement requirements.

(B) Number of members who are specified excluded from work or community engagement.

(C) Number of members who receive mandatory exceptions, including the number of members who request and receive short-term hardships.

(d) (1) Commencing no later than January 1, 2028, the department shall operationalize the data dashboard and shall post the information described in subdivisions (a), (b), and (c) on a quarterly basis in a downloadable format.

(2) The department shall develop the dashboard in consultation with stakeholders, including consumers, advocates, Medi-Cal managed care plans, providers, counties, and the Legislature through the department-convened stakeholder
 workgroup meetings to ensure that the dashboard is user-friendly and that the data relied on can be accessed by the public.

(e) In developing the dashboard, the department shall consider all of the following objectives, among others:

(1) To learn and document the impact of Public Law 119-21 on Californians who apply for, or are enrolled in, the Medi-Cal program.

(2) To allow the department and stakeholders to identify trends or problems with eligibility and enrollment in the Medi-Cal program based on the quarterly data reported, tracked, and analyzed over time to improve the program and address systemic or electronic application technology issues with the eligibility systems.

(3) To obtain reliable data that are collected and analyzed in a timely
 fashion.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 27, Sec. 73.   (SB 164)   Effective June 29, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

14005.37.

(a) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) or as provided in Section 14005.39, a county shall perform redeterminations of eligibility for Medi-Cal beneficiaries every 12 months and shall promptly redetermine eligibility whenever the county receives information about changes in a beneficiary’s circumstances that may affect eligibility for Medi-Cal benefits. The procedures for redetermining Medi-Cal eligibility described in this section shall apply to all Medi-Cal
 beneficiaries, including those individuals who are subject to six-month redeterminations as described in paragraph (2).

(2) Effective no sooner than March 1, 2027, notwithstanding paragraph (1), with respect to redeterminations of Medi-Cal eligibility scheduled on or after January 1, 2027, a county shall perform redeterminations once every six months for the following individuals:

(A) An individual enrolled under Section 1396a(a)(10)(A)(i)(VIII) of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(B) An individual who receives state-funded Medi-Cal coverage and who meets the same criteria described in
 Section 1396a(a)(10)(A)(i)(VIII) of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(3) The requirements described in paragraph (2) shall not apply to any individual described in Section 1396a(xx)(9)(A)(ii)(II) of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(b) Loss of eligibility for cash aid under that program shall not result in a redetermination under this section unless the reason for the loss of eligibility is one that would result in the need for a redetermination for a person whose eligibility for Medi-Cal under Section 14005.30 was determined without a concurrent determination of eligibility for cash aid under the CalWORKs program.

(c) A loss of contact, as evidenced by the return of mail marked in such a way as to indicate that it could not be delivered to the intended recipient or that there was no
 forwarding address, shall require a prompt redetermination according to the procedures set forth in this section.

(d) Except as otherwise provided in this section, Medi-Cal eligibility shall continue during the redetermination process described in this section and a beneficiary’s Medi-Cal eligibility shall not be terminated under this section until the county makes a specific determination based on facts clearly demonstrating that the beneficiary is no longer eligible for Medi-Cal benefits under any basis and due process rights guaranteed under this division have been met. For the purposes of this subdivision, for a beneficiary who is subject to the use of MAGI-based financial methods, the determination of whether the beneficiary is eligible for Medi-Cal benefits under any basis shall include, but is not limited to, a determination of eligibility for Medi-Cal benefits on a basis that is exempt from the use of MAGI-based financial methods only
 if either of the following occurs:

(1) The county assesses the beneficiary as being potentially eligible under a program that is exempt from the use of MAGI-based financial methods, including, but not limited to, on the basis of age, blindness, disability, or the need for long-term care services and supports.

(2) The beneficiary requests that the county determine whether the beneficiary is eligible for Medi-Cal benefits on a basis that is exempt from the use of MAGI-based financial methods.

(e) (1) For purposes of acquiring information necessary to conduct the eligibility redeterminations described in this section, a county shall gather information available to the county that is relevant to the beneficiary’s Medi-Cal eligibility prior to contacting the beneficiary. Sources for these efforts
 shall include information contained in the beneficiary’s file or other information, including more recent information available to the county, including, but not limited to, Medi-Cal, CalWORKs, and CalFresh case files of the beneficiary or of any of their immediate family members, which are open, or were closed within the last 90 days, information accessed through any databases accessed under Sections 435.948, 435.949, and 435.956 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations, and, wherever feasible, other sources of relevant information reasonably available to the county or to the county via the department.

(2) In the case of an annual or six-month redetermination, if, based upon information obtained pursuant to paragraph (1), the county is able to make a determination of continued eligibility, the county shall notify the beneficiary of
 both of the following:

(A) The eligibility determination and the information it is based on.

(B) That the beneficiary is required to inform the county via the internet, by telephone, by mail, in person, or through other commonly available electronic means, in counties where such electronic communication is available, if any information contained in the notice is inaccurate but that the beneficiary is not required to sign and return the notice if all information provided on the notice is accurate.

(3) The county shall make all reasonable efforts not to send multiple notices during the same time period about eligibility. The notice of eligibility renewal shall contain other related information such as if the beneficiary is in a new Medi-Cal program.

(4) In the case of a redetermination due to a change in circumstances, if a county determines that the change in circumstances does not affect the beneficiary’s eligibility status, the county shall not send the beneficiary a notice unless required to do so by federal law.

(f) (1) In the case of an annual or six-month eligibility redetermination, if the county is unable to determine continued eligibility based on the information obtained pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (e), the beneficiary shall be so informed and shall be provided with an annual or six-month renewal form, at least 60 days before the beneficiary’s annual
 or six-month
 redetermination date, that is prepopulated with information that the county has obtained and that identifies any additional information needed by the county to determine eligibility. The form shall include all of the following:

(A) The requirement that the beneficiary provide any necessary information to the county within 60 days of the date that the form is sent to the beneficiary.

(B) That the beneficiary may respond to the county via the internet, by mail, by telephone, in person, or through other commonly available electronic means if those means are available in that county.

(C) That if the beneficiary chooses to return the form or renewal information to the county in
 person, by telephone, online, via mail, or through commonly available electronic means, the beneficiary shall sign the form in order for it to be considered complete. A county shall accept electronic signatures, including telephonically recorded signatures, signatures obtained through an online application, handwritten signatures transmitted via other commonly available electronic means, if those means are available in that county, and electronic signatures initiated or collected by third parties through one of the software programs approved by the department as meeting the criteria of Section 16.5 of the Government Code.

(D) The telephone number to call in order to obtain more information.

(2) The county shall attempt to contact the
 beneficiary via the internet, by telephone, or through other commonly available electronic means, if those means are available in that county, during the 60-day period after the prepopulated form is mailed to the beneficiary to collect the necessary information if the beneficiary has not responded to the request for additional information or has provided an incomplete response.

(3) If the beneficiary has not provided any response to the written request for information sent pursuant to paragraph (1) within 60 days from the date the form is sent, the county shall terminate the beneficiary’s eligibility for Medi-Cal benefits following the provision of timely notice.

(4) If the beneficiary responds to the written request for information during the 60-day period pursuant to paragraph (1) but the information provided is incomplete, the county shall follow the procedures set forth in
 paragraph (3) of subdivision (g) to work with the beneficiary to complete the information.

(5) (A) The form required by this subdivision shall be developed by the department in consultation with the counties and representatives of eligibility workers and consumers.

(B) For beneficiaries whose eligibility is not determined using MAGI-based financial methods, the county may use existing renewal forms until the state develops prepopulated renewal forms to provide to beneficiaries. The department shall develop prepopulated renewal forms for use with beneficiaries whose eligibility is not determined using MAGI-based financial methods by January 1, 2015.

(g) (1) In the case of a redetermination due to change in circumstances, if a county cannot obtain sufficient information to
 redetermine eligibility pursuant to subdivision (e), the county shall send to the beneficiary a form that states the information needed to redetermine eligibility. The county shall only request information related to the change in circumstances. The county shall not request information or documentation that has been previously provided by the beneficiary, that is not absolutely necessary to complete the eligibility determination, or that is not subject to change. The county shall only request information for nonapplicants necessary to make an eligibility determination or for a purpose directly related to the administration of the state Medicaid plan. The form shall advise the individual to provide any necessary information to the county via the internet, by telephone, by mail, in person, or through other commonly available electronic means. The beneficiary is not required to sign or return the form. The form shall include a telephone number to call in order to obtain more information. Future revisions to the
 form shall be developed by the department in consultation with the counties, representatives of consumers, and eligibility workers. A Medi-Cal beneficiary shall have 30 days from the date the form is mailed pursuant to this subdivision to respond.

(2) If the purpose for a redetermination under this section is a loss of contact with the Medi-Cal beneficiary, as evidenced by the return of mail marked in such a way as to indicate that it could not be delivered to the intended recipient or that there was no forwarding address, a return of the form described in this subdivision marked as undeliverable shall result in an immediate notice of action terminating Medi-Cal eligibility.

(3) During the 30-day period after the date of mailing of a form to the Medi-Cal beneficiary pursuant to this subdivision, the county shall attempt to contact the beneficiary by telephone, in writing, or other
 commonly available electronic means, in counties where such electronic communication is available, to request the necessary information if the beneficiary has not responded to the request for additional information or has provided an incomplete response. If the beneficiary does not supply the necessary information to the county within the 30-day limit, a 10-day notice of termination of Medi-Cal eligibility shall be sent.

(h) Beneficiaries shall be required to report any change in circumstances that may affect their eligibility within 10 calendar days following the date the change occurred.

(i) (1) If, within 90 days of a Medi-Cal beneficiary’s eligibility termination date or a change in eligibility status due to the beneficiary’s failure to provide
 needed information, the discontinued beneficiary submits to the county a signed and completed form or otherwise provides the needed information to the county, eligibility shall be redetermined in a timely manner by the county without requiring a new application. The beneficiary shall be entitled to request a Medi-Cal eligibility determination for any of the three months immediately prior to the month in which the beneficiary provided the needed information to the county, in accordance with Section 14019. This paragraph shall become inoperative on January 1, 2027.

(2) Beginning on January 1, 2027, for Medi-Cal beneficiaries described in subparagraph (A) or (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), if, within 90 days of the beneficiary’s eligibility
 termination date or a change in eligibility status due to the beneficiary’s failure to provide needed information, the discontinued beneficiary submits to the county a signed and completed form or otherwise provides the needed information to the county, eligibility shall be redetermined in a timely manner by the county without requiring a new application. The beneficiary shall be entitled to request a Medi-Cal eligibility determination for the month immediately prior to the month in which the beneficiary provided the needed information to the county, in accordance with Section 14019.

(3) Beginning on January 1, 2027, for all Medi-Cal beneficiaries not described in paragraph (2), if, within 90 days of a Medi-Cal beneficiary’s eligibility termination date or a change in eligibility status due to the beneficiary’s failure to provide needed information, the discontinued beneficiary submits to the county a signed and completed form or otherwise
 provides the needed information to the county, eligibility shall be redetermined in a timely manner by the county without requiring a new application. The beneficiary shall be entitled to request a Medi-Cal eligibility determination for either of the two months immediately prior to the month in which the beneficiary provided the needed information to the county, in accordance with Section 14019.

(j) If the information available to the county pursuant to the redetermination procedures of this section does not indicate a basis of eligibility, Medi-Cal benefits may be terminated so long as due process requirements have otherwise been met.

(k) The department shall, with the counties and representatives of consumers, including those with disabilities, and Medi-Cal eligibility workers, develop a timeframe for redetermination of Medi-Cal eligibility based upon
 disability, including ex parte review, the redetermination forms described in subdivisions (f) and (g), timeframes for responding to county or state requests for additional information, and the forms and procedures to be used. The forms and procedures shall be as consumer-friendly as possible for people with disabilities. The timeframe shall provide a reasonable and adequate opportunity for the Medi-Cal beneficiary to obtain and submit medical records and other information needed to establish eligibility for Medi-Cal based upon disability.

(l) The county shall consider blindness as continuing until the reviewing physician determines that a beneficiary’s vision has improved beyond the applicable definition of blindness contained in the plan.

(m) The county shall consider disability as continuing until the review team determines that a beneficiary’s disability no longer meets
 the applicable definition of disability contained in the plan.

(n) In the case of a redetermination due to a change in circumstances, if a county determines that the beneficiary remains eligible for Medi-Cal benefits, the county shall begin a new 12-month or 6-month eligibility period.

(o) For individuals determined ineligible for Medi-Cal by a county following the redetermination procedures set forth in this section, the county shall determine eligibility for other insurance affordability programs, and, if the individual is found to be eligible, the county shall, as appropriate, transfer the individual’s electronic account to other insurance affordability programs via a secure electronic interface.

(p) Any
 renewal form or notice shall be accessible to persons who are limited-English proficient and persons with disabilities consistent with all federal and state requirements.

(q) The requirements to provide information in subdivisions (e) and (g), and to report changes in circumstances in subdivision (h), may be provided through any of the modes of submission allowed in Section 435.907(a) of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations, including an internet website identified by the department, telephone, mail, in person, and other commonly available electronic means as authorized by the department.

(r) Forms required to be signed by a beneficiary pursuant to this section shall be signed under penalty of perjury. Electronic signatures, telephonic signatures, and handwritten signatures transmitted by electronic transmission shall be accepted.

(s) For purposes of this section, “MAGI-based financial methods” means income calculated using the financial methodologies described in Section 1396a(e)(14) of Title 42 of the United States Code, and as added by the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Public Law 111-148), as amended by the federal Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010 (Public Law 111-152), and any subsequent amendments.

(t) When contacting a beneficiary under paragraphs (2) and (4) of subdivision (f), and paragraph (3) of subdivision (g), a county shall first attempt to use the method of contact identified by the beneficiary as the preferred method of contact, if a method has been identified.
